Arkansas, session 2025, SB472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 60, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-60-126. Purchase or possession of an e-liquid or a vapor product by
a minor.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "E-liquid product" means a liquid, which may contain
nicotine, that is inhaled when using a vapor product, and that may include
without limitation propylene glycol, vegetable glycerin, nicotine from any
source, and flavorings;
(2)(A) "Minor" means a person who is under twenty-one (21) years
of age.
(B) "Minor" does not include a person who is under twenty-
one years of age and presents a military identification card establishing
that he or she is a member of the United States Armed Forces; and
(3)(A) "Vapor product" means an electronic oral device of any
size or shape that contains a vapor of nicotine, e-liquid product, or any
*CEB156*
03-18-2025 10:11:06 CEB156

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 SB472
other substance that when used or inhaled simulates smoking, regardless of
whether a visible vapor is produced, including without limitation a device
that:
(i) Is composed of a heating element, battery,
electronic circuit, chemical process, mechanical device, or a combination of
a heating element, a battery, an electronic circuit, a chemical process, or a
mechanical device;
(ii) Works in combination with a cartridge, other
container, or liquid delivery device containing nicotine, an e-liquid
product, or another substance that is manufactured for use with a vapor
product; and
(iii) Is manufactured, distributed, marketed, or
sold as any type or derivation of a vapor product, an e-cigarette, an e-
cigar, an e-pipe, or another product that is similar to a vapor product.
(B) "Vapor product" does not include a product regulated
as a drug or device by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. §
301 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(b) It is unlawful for a minor to purchase or possess an e-liquid
product or a vapor product.
(c) An officer that seizes an e-liquid product or a vapor product
found in the possession of a minor shall destroy the item or dispose of the
item as contraband under § 5-5-101.
(d) Purchase or possession of an e-liquid product or a vapor product
by a minor is a violation and is punishable by a fine not to exceed one
hundred dollars ($100) or up to twenty (20) hours of community service work,
or both.
(e) It is not a violation of this section if the minor was acting
under § 5-27-227(c).

/s/J. Bryant






03-18-2025 10:11:06 CEB156